src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON GUOKTEDUHAT   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e#duhát K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>n#duháh%>in K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e#duhát K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#duhát K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#duhát NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#duháh%>is K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e%>X4#duháh%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#duháh%>at K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#duháh%>ij K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:i%>X5jde#duháh%>ijdda K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:i%>X5jgujn#duháh%>ijgujn K ;

LEXICON NUBBEDUHAT   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e#duhát K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>n#duháh%>in K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e%>X4#duhát K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#duhát NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#duháh%>is K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e%>X4#duháh%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#duháh%>at K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#duháh%>ij K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:i%>X5jde#duháh%>ijdda K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:i%>X5jgujn#duháh%>ijgujn K ;

LEXICON GOLBMADUHAT   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:#duhát K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n#duháh%>in K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#duhát K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#duhát NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#duháh%>is K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#duháh%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#duháh%>at K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#duháh%>ij K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde#duháh%>ijdda K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jd9#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn#duháh%>ijgujn K ;

LEXICON VIHTTADUHAT   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta#duhát K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>n#duháh%>in K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa#duhát K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#duhát NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa#duháh%>is K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:đa#duháh%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#duháh%>at K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa#duháh%>ij K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:đa%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:đa%>jde#duháh%>ijdda K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:đa%>jd9#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:đa%>jgujn#duháh%>ijgujn K ;

LEXICON CIEZADUHAT   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:eža#duhát K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:ehča#duhát K ;
 +Num+Ess:ehča%>n#duháh%>in K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:eža#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža#duhát K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:eža#duhát NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:eža#duháh%>is K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:eža#duháh%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>t#duháh%>at K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:eža#duháh%>ij K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:eža%>jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:eža%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:eža%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:eža%>jde#duháh%>ijdda K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža%>jd9#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža%>jgujn#duháh%>ijgujn K ;

LEXICON GAVCCIDUHAT   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:#duhát K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#duhát K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n#duháh%>in K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#duhát K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#duhát NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#duháh%>is K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#duháh%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#duháh%>at K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#duháh%>ij K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde#duháh%>ijdda K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jd9#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn#duháh%>ijgujn K ;



LEXICON CIEZAS   !!≈ * __@CODE@__  Collective numerals
 +N+Coll+Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: K ;  !
 +N+Coll+Sg+Acc:a K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc: K ;  !
 +N+Coll+Pl+Nom:at K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Ill:ij K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc:is K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:in K ;  ! !SOUTH
 +N+Coll+Sg+Com:ijn K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Gen:iX5jd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Acc:iX5jd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Ill:ijdda K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc:ijn K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:ijs K ;  ! !SOUTH
 +N+Coll+Pl+Com:ijgujn K ;
 +Sg+Nom: PxC ;
 +CmpN/SgG:a R ;  !compound also for these
 +CmpN/SgG: R ;  !compound also for these
 +Sg+Gen: PxC ;
 +Sg+Acc: PxC ;
 +Sg+Ill:asa%> PxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Nom:ijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Sg+Loc:istti%> PxVvowch ;
 +Sg+Com:ijnni%> PxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Nom:ijddi%> PxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Gen:ijddi%> PxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Acc:ijddi%> PxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijddás%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:ijnni%> PxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Com:ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;


LEXICON VIDAS   !!≈ * __@CODE@__  Collective numerals
 +N+Coll+Sg+Nom:đas K ;
 +N+Coll+Ess:đas%>in K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Gen:httas%>a K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:httas K ;  !
 +N+Coll+Sg+Acc:httas%>a K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:httas K ;  !
 +N+Coll+Pl+Nom:httas%>at K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Ill:httas%>ij K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc:httas%>is K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:httas%>in K ;  ! !SOUTH
 +N+Coll+Sg+Com:httas%>ijn K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Gen:httas%>iX5jd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Acc:httas%>iX5jd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Ill:httas%>ijdda K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc:httas%>ijn K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:httas%>ijs K ;  ! !SOUTH
 +N+Coll+Pl+Com:httas%>ijgujn K ;
 +Sg+Nom:httas%> PxC ;
 +CmpN/SgG:httas%>a R ;  !compound also for these
 +CmpN/SgG:httas%> R ;  !compound also for these
 +Sg+Gen:httas%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Acc:httas%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Ill:httas%>asa PxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Nom:httas%>ijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Sg+Loc:httas%>istti%> PxVvowch ;
 +Sg+Com:httas%>ijnni%> PxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Nom:httas%>ijddi%> PxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Gen:httas%>ijddi%> PxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Acc:httas%>ijddi%> PxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Ill:httas%>ijddás%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:httas%>ijnni%> PxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Com:httas%>ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;


LEXICON BEANNOT   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ one and a half
+Ess:nubbi%>n K ;
+Sg+Gen:nubbi%>X4 K ;
+Sg+Ill+Attr:nubbi%>X4 K ;
+Sg+Loc+Attr:nubbi%>X4 K ;
  :nubbi%>X4X7# NAMAT ;
+Sg+Acc:nubbi%>X4 K ;
+Sg+Ill:nubbi%>X3j K ;
+Sg+Loc:nubbi%>X4s K ;
+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth+Use/NG:nubbi%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:nubbi%>X5jn K ;
+Pl+Nom:nubbi%>X4t K ;
+Pl+Gen:nubbi%>X5jd9 K ;
+Pl+Com+Attr:nubbi%>X5jd9 K ;
!+Pl+Gen:nubbi%>X5jd9# NAMAT ;
+Pl+Acc:nubbi%>X5jd9 K ;
+Pl+Ill:nubbi%>X5jde K ;
+Pl+Loc:nubbi%>X5jn K ;
+Pl+Com:nubbi%>X5jgujn K ;


LEXICON yeartag
 +Num+Sem/Year: dateyearcase ;

LEXICON yeartagpl
          +Num+Sem/Year+Pl+Nom:    # ;
          +Num+Sem/Year+Pl+Gen:    # ;
          +Num+Sem/Year+Pl+Acc:    # ;
 +Num+Sem/Year+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc:%:s # ;

LEXICON dateyearcase
          +Sg+Nom:     #      ;
          +Sg+Gen:     #      ;
          +Sg+Acc:     #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Acc:%:a  #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Gen:%:a  #      ;
          +Sg+Loc:%:s  #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Loc:s    #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Loc:%:is #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Loc:%:as #      ;
          +Sg+Ill:%:i  #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:i    #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:%:ii #      ;
     +Sg+Ill+Attr:     #      ;
     +Sg+Loc+Attr:     #      ;
      +Cmp/SplitR:%-   ENDLEX ;
      +Cmp/SplitR:%–   ENDLEX ;


LEXICON ARABICCASES   !!≈ * __@CODE@__  to distinguish between 0 and oblique
ARABICCASE0 ;
ARABICCASE ;

LEXICON num-imprecise   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ Imprecise numbers
máŋgaduhát:máŋ'ga GOLBMADUHAT ;
moaddeduhát:moadd GUOKTEDUHAT ;
galleduhát:gall GUOKTEDUHAT ;
beannot+Num:beal# BEANNOT ;
